New Mexico, session 2026, HB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the workforce solutions department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to support lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer persons experiencing homelessness with eviction prevention and housing assistance. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233351.1